South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3524.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 16-3-1410(C)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2) Crime victim service providers, serving in public or private nonprofit programs and employed on the effective date of this article, are exempt from basic certification requirements but must meet annual continuing education requirements to maintain certification. Crime victim service providers, serving in public or private nonprofit programs and employed after the effective date of this article, are required to complete the basic certification requirements within one year from the date of employment and to meet annual continuing education requirements to maintain certification throughout their employment. SECTION 2.  Section 16-3-1420(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) "Victim service provider" means a person: (a) who is employed by a local government or state agency and whose job duties involve providing victim assistance as mandated by South Carolina law; or (b) whose job duties involve providing direct services to victims and who is employed by an organization that is incorporated in South Carolina, holds a certificate of authority in South Carolina, or is registered as a charitable organization in South Carolina, and the organization's mission is victim assistance or advocacy and the organization is privately funded or receives funds from federal, state, or local governments to provide services to victims. "Victim service provider" does not include a mental health clinician licensed in South Carolina, municipal court judge, magistrates court judge, circuit court judge, special circuit court judge, or family court judge. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----